New Jersey, session 222, S397.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. a.  An electric, gas, and water public utility, as defined in R.S.48:2-13, shall develop and implement a plan to notify customers that opt into receiving such notifications from the public utility, in a format requested by the customer, which format may include, but shall not be limited to, an autodialed telephone call, text message, or electronic mail alert service maintained by the public utility, information concerning a service outage  that lasts for one hour or longer in duration. The information conveyed by such notifications shall include, but not be limited to: (1)  the location and estimated length of the service outage; (2)  contact information for the public utility and emergency services; (3)  information on how to report any other service problem related to the service outage; and (4)  any relevant updates to address the service outage as the situation progresses. b.   The Office of Emergency Management, the Division of State Police, and any other appropriate State, county, or municipal entity may disseminate information made available by a public utility pursuant to subsection a. of this section. c.   As used in this section: Autodialed telephone call means a telephone call made using equipment that makes a series of telephone calls to stored telephone numbers using an artificial or prerecorded voice message. Service outage means any discontinuance of electric, gas, or water public utility service beyond the control of the public utility providing that service. Service outage shall not include the discontinuance of service to a customer for bill nonpayment. 2.    This act shall take effect 180 days after the date of enactment.